Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4506.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
CHAPTER IX
Sec. 25b. (1) This section applies to a criminal defendant who
was 18, 19, or 20 years of age at the time the criminal defendant
committed an offense described in subsection (2) if either of the
following apply:
(a) The defendant is convicted of the offense on or after the
effective date of the amendatory act that added this section.
(b) The defendant was convicted of the offense before the
effective date of the amendatory act that added this section.
ELF H02980'25 (H-1) vmwqug


(2) The prosecuting attorney may file a motion under this
section to sentence a defendant described in subsection (1) to
imprisonment for life without the possibility of parole if the
individual is or was convicted of any of the following violations:
(a) A violation of section 17764(7) of the public health code,
1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17764.
(b) A violation of section 16(5), 18(7), 316, 436(2)(e), or
543f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.16, 750.18,
750.316, 750.436, and 750.543f.
(c) A violation of chapter XXXIII of the Michigan penal code,
1931 PA 328, MCL 750.200 to 750.212a.
(d) Any violation of law involving the death of another person
for which parole eligibility is expressly denied under state law.
(3) If the prosecuting attorney intends to seek a sentence of
imprisonment for life without the possibility of parole for a case
described in subsection (1)(a), the prosecuting attorney shall file
the motion not later than 42 days after the defendant is convicted
of that violation. If the prosecuting attorney intends to seek a
sentence of imprisonment for life without the possibility of parole
for a case described under subsection (1)(b), the prosecuting
attorney shall file the motion not later than 360 days after the
effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. The
motion must specify the grounds on which the prosecuting attorney
is requesting the court to impose a sentence of imprisonment for
life without the possibility of parole.
(4) If the prosecuting attorney does not file a motion under
subsection (3) within the time periods provided for in that
subsection, the court shall sentence the defendant to a term of
years as provided in subsection (10).
ELF H02980'25 (H-1) vmwqug


(5) If the prosecuting attorney files a motion under
subsection (2) requesting that the individual be sentenced to
imprisonment for life without parole eligibility, the individual
shall file a response to the prosecution's motion not later than 14
days after receiving notice of the motion.
(6) The sentencing judge or the judge's successor shall
determine whether a sentence of imprisonment will be imprisonment
for life without parole eligibility or a term of years as provided
under subsection (10).
(7) If the prosecuting attorney files a motion under
subsection (2), the court shall conduct a hearing on the motion as
part of the sentencing process. At the hearing, the trial court
shall consider the factors listed in Miller v Alabama, 567 US 460;
132 S Ct 2455; 183 L Ed 2d 407 (2012), and may consider any other
criteria relevant to the court's decision, including the
defendant's record while incarcerated.
(8) At the hearing under subsection (7), the court shall
specify on the record the aggravating and mitigating circumstances
considered by the court and the court's reasons supporting the
sentence imposed. The court may consider evidence presented at
trial together with any evidence presented at the sentencing
hearing.
(9) Each victim must be afforded the right under section 15 of
the William Van Regenmorter crime victim's rights act, 1985 PA 87,
MCL 780.765, to appear before the court and make an oral impact
statement at any sentencing or resentencing of the defendant under
this section.
(10) If the court decides not to sentence the individual to
imprisonment for life without parole eligibility, both of the
ELF H02980'25 (H-1) vmwqug


following apply:
(a) The court shall sentence the individual to a term of
imprisonment for which the maximum term must be not less than 60
years and the minimum term must be not less than 25 years or more
than 40 years.
(b) If the individual is being sentenced for more than 1
violation of law involving the death of another person, and those
violations arise out of the same transaction or occurrence, the
sentences imposed for each of the violations of law involving the
death of another person must be served consecutively to each other.
(11) Resentencing hearings under this section must be held in
the following order of priority:
(a) Cases involving defendants who have served 25 or more
years of imprisonment must be heard first.
(b) Cases in which the prosecuting attorney has filed a motion
requesting a sentence of imprisonment for life without the
possibility of parole must be heard after cases described in
subdivision (a).
(c) All other cases not described under subdivision (a) or (b)
must be heard after the cases described under subdivision (a) or
(b).
(12) A defendant who is resentenced under this section must be
given credit for time already served.
Final Page
ELF H02980'25 (H-1) vmwqug